District of Columbia statutes.
9-101.01

Control and repair of streets.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia shall have entire control of, and the Council of the District of Columbia shall make all regulations which it shall deem necessary for keeping in repair, the streets, avenues, alleys, and sewers of the City, and all other works which may be intrusted to the Mayor’s charge by the Congress.

R.S., D.C., § 77
June 20, 1874, 18 Stat. 116, ch. 337, § 2
June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 103, ch. 180, § 2

History

Regulations necessary for the protection of lives, limbs, health, comfort, and quiet, see § 1-303.03.
Removal of snow and ice, see § 9-601 et seq.
Street cleaning and sewer maintenance, see § 1-305.01.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 7-101.
1973 Ed., § 7-101.

Prior Codifications

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(150) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government